Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 6 State Health Planning
and Development

Cross references.

Offering continuing care when resident purchases resident owned living unit, §

33-45-7.1

.

Administration of mental health and developmental disabilities services generally, T. 37, C. 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1, effective July 1, 1983, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, also pertaining to state health planning and development, and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 31-6-1, 31-6-2, 31-6-20 through 31-6-28, and 31-6-40 through 31-6-51 and was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 941, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1109, §§ 1-3; and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Health Planning, Chapter 111-2-1.

Certificate of need, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Health Planning, Chapter 111-2-2.

Patient’s right to independent review, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Health Planning, Chapter 111-2-3.